Illinois, session 104th, SB4041.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Permanent Noise Monitoring Act is amended 5by adding Section 16 as follows: 6    (620 ILCS 35/16 new)7    Sec. 16. Noise contour studies.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Airport sponsor" means the entity that owns or operates a 10covered airport.11    "Covered airport" means an airport, as defined in Section 126 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, that is a commercial 13service airport and that had more than 150,000 aircraft 14operations, take-offs and landings, during the immediately 15preceding calendar year.16    "Noise contour study" means a noise exposure map and 17accompanying documentation prepared in accordance with 14 CFR 18Part 150 for existing conditions and forecast conditions.19    (b) Beginning no later than December 31, 2030 and every 5 20years thereafter, the airport sponsor shall prepare or cause 21to be prepared a noise contour study for each covered airport 22under its jurisdiction.23    (c) Each noise contour study required under this Section   SB4041 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20739 JDS 34242 b1shall:2        (1) be prepared using the methodology required under 3    14 CFR Part 150;4        (2) include contours for existing conditions and 5    forecast conditions;6        (3) identify the location and extent of noncompatible 7    land uses within the contours to the extent required under 8    14 CFR Part 150;9        (4) include a summary of changes, if any, from the 10    most recently completed noise contour study; and11        (5) include a modernization review evaluating whether 12    additional analysis should be included in future studies, 13    including, but not limited to:14            (A) the use of supplemental noise contours, 15        including contours below DNL 65 dB;16            (B) changes in federal guidance, methodology, or 17        modeling tools;18            (C) changes in aircraft operations, fleet mix, 19        runway usage, nighttime operations, or surrounding 20        land uses; and21            (D) whether additional metrics, thresholds, or 22        disclosure practices should be used for informational 23        or planning purposes in addition to those required 24        under 14 CFR Part 150.25    (d) The modernization review required under paragraph (5) 26of subsection (c) shall include findings and recommendations   SB4041 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20739 JDS 34242 b1concerning whether any revisions to applicable noise 2thresholds, contours, methodologies, or disclosure practices 3should be considered by the airport sponsor, the State, or the 4Federal Aviation Administration. 5    (e) The airport sponsor shall make each completed noise 6contour study available to the public on its website and shall 7submit a copy to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the 8Senate Minority Leader, the Speaker of the House of 9Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of 10Representatives.11    (f) Nothing in this Section prohibits the airport sponsor 12from preparing a revised or supplemental noise contour study 13at any time more frequently than required under this Section.